Arkansas, session 2025, HB1097.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - UTILITIES DIVISION. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas Public Service Commission - Utilities Division
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular
employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U005U PSC CHAIRMAN 1 GRADE SE03
(2) U004U PSC COMMISSIONER 2 GRADE SE01
(3) U050U PSC DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE01
(4) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(5) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 2 GRADE IT07
*CJW005*
01/06/2025 2:10:22 PM CJW005

HB1097
(6) D054C COMPUTER SUPPORT COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT05
(7) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(8) G003N PSC CHIEF ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 GRADE GS15
(9) B145C DIRECTOR OF ENGINEERING 1 GRADE GS14
(10) G011N PSC ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE 4 GRADE GS14
(11) G006N PSC CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS14
(12) G343C PSC CHIEF OF STAFF 1 GRADE GS14
(13) X001C PSC DIR OF ELECTRIC UTILITIES SECT 1 GRADE GS14
(14) N043N PSC DIRECTOR OF FINANCIAL ANALYSIS 1 GRADE GS14
(15) P080C PSC DIRECTOR OF TELECOMM & CONSUMER 1 GRADE GS14
(16) A129C PSC QUALITY SERVICES DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(17) A130C PSC RATES & DEMAND RESOURCES DIR 1 GRADE GS14
(18) G278C PSC RESEARCH & POLICY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(19) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(20) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(21) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(22) A013C PSC DIRECTOR OF REVENUE REQUIREMENTS 1 GRADE GS12
(23) G299C PSC ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(24) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(25) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS11
(26) B023C ENGINEER, P.E. 2 GRADE GS11
(27) X033C PSC SENIOR PUBLIC UTILITY AUDITOR 4 GRADE GS11
(28) A028C PSC SENIOR RATE CASE ANALYST 8 GRADE GS11
(29) G073C ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS10
(30) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(31) A046C PSC RATE CASE ANALYST 13 GRADE GS09
(32) X064C PSC PUBLIC UTILITY AUDITOR 5 GRADE GS08
(33) G164C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE COMM 1 GRADE GS07
(34) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(35) A065C PAYROLL SERVICES COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS07
(36) X218C PSC COMPLAINTS INVESTIGATOR SUPER 1 GRADE GS07
(37) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 5 GRADE GS06
(38) G123C PSC CLERK 1 GRADE GS06
(39) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(40) C022C BUSINESS OPERATIONS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(41) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 2 GRADE GS04
01/06/2025 2:10:22 PM CJW005

HB1097
(42) X167C COMPLAINTS INVESTIGATOR 7 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 91

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - UTILITIES DIVISION. There is hereby
authorized, for the Arkansas Public Service Commission - Utilities Division
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or
temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: six (6) temporary or part-time
employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the
Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act
for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - UTILITIES DIVISION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Service Commission, to be payable from
the Public Service Commission Fund, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Arkansas Public Service Commission - Utilities Division for
the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $6,808,557
(02) EXTRA HELP 14,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,287,548
(04) OVERTIME 5,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,070,597
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 78,922
(C) PROF. FEES 10,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) BUILDING REPAIRS/MAINTENANCE 24,319
(07) FED REGULATORY SERVICES 290,575
(08) PROFESSIONAL SERVICES 998,000
(09) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 138,856
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $11,726,374

01/06/2025 2:10:22 PM CJW005

HB1097
SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES - TAX DIVISION. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas Public Service Commission - Tax Division for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N071N PSC TAX DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS14
(2) A019C PSC TAX DIVISION ASSISTANT DIR 1 GRADE GS11
(3) G268C PSC MOTOR CARRIER ASST DIV DIR 1 GRADE GS10
(4) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(5) A047C FINANCIAL ANALYST II 1 GRADE GS08
(6) A076C FINANCE PROGRAM ANALYST 1 GRADE GS07
(7) A064C PSC TAX VALUATION SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(8) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(9) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
(10) A095C PSC TAX DIV VALUATION ANALYST 6 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 15

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP - TAX DIVISION. There is hereby authorized, for
the Arkansas Public Service Commission - Tax Division for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: five (5) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - TAX DIVISION. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Arkansas Public Service Commission, to be payable from the Tax
Division Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Arkansas
Public Service Commission - Tax Division for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
01/06/2025 2:10:22 PM CJW005

HB1097
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $766,834
(02) EXTRA HELP 38,238
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 299,096
(04) OVERTIME 5,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 194,472
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,500
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,424,140

SECTION 7. REGULAR SALARIES - PIPELINE SAFETY PROGRAM. There is hereby
established for the Arkansas Public Service Commission - Pipeline Safety
Program for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N248N PSC DIRECTOR OF PIPELINE SAFETY 1 GRADE GS14
(2) G341C PIPELINE SAFETY PROGRAM MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(3) X216C PSC PIPELINE SAFETY COORDINATOR 7 GRADE GS09
(4) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 10

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - PIPELINE SAFETY PROGRAM. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Arkansas Public Service Commission, to be payable from
the Public Service Commission Utility Safety Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Arkansas Public Service Commission - Pipeline
Safety Program for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
01/06/2025 2:10:22 PM CJW005

HB1097
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $692,707
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 238,384
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 105,714
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,620
(C) PROF. FEES 2,229
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 175,440
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,240,094

SECTION 9. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
REFUND TO EXPENDITURE. The proceeds from the reimbursement of travel expenses
received by the Public Service Commission, shall be deposited into the same
State Treasury Fund or Fund Account from which the original travel
expenditure was incurred as a refund to expenditure to the credit of the
appropriation from which the original expenditure was made.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 10. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 11. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
01/06/2025 2:10:22 PM CJW005

HB1097
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 12. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.






















01/06/2025 2:10:22 PM CJW005